Hawaii statutes.
§490:8-407 Authenticating trustee, transfer
agent, and registrar. A person acting as authenticating trustee, transfer
agent, registrar, or other agent for an issuer in the registration of a
transfer of its securities, in the issue of new security certificates or
uncertificated securities, or in the cancellation of surrendered security
certificates has the same obligation to the holder or owner of a certificated
or uncertificated security with regard to the particular functions performed as
the issuer has in regard to those functions. [L 1997, c 33, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next